Vermont statutes. Title 4 Judiciary
Chapter 9. District Court

§ 421.
Repealed.
1965, No. 194, § 16.

§§ 421a-435.
Repealed.
1967, No. 194, § 22, eff. March 1, 1968.

§ 436.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 436a.
Repealed. 2011, No. 1, § 7, eff. Feb. 2, 2011.

§ 436b.
Repealed. 2003, No. 71 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 437.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 438.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§§ 439-444.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 444a.
Repealed.

§ 445.
Repealed.
1979, No. 181 (Adj. Sess.), § 22.

§ 446.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238.